Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2687.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5169HV (1) 91 sb/js H.F. 2687 Section 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. 1 1. Iowaâs groundwater resources are essential for drinking 2 water, agriculture, and economic vitality. 3 2. The Iowa geological survey currently monitors 4 groundwater levels in approximately sixty wells statewide, 5 which is insufficient to represent the diversity of Iowaâs 6 aquifers. 7 3. Installing new dedicated monitoring wells is costly, 8 while many existing wells owned by businesses or other private 9 entities could provide valuable data if retrofitted with modern 10 monitoring equipment. 11 4. Retrofitting existing wells offers a safe, 12 cost-effective strategy to expand the monitoring network, 13 improve data for water resource management, and protect public 14 health. 15 5. It is therefore in the interest of the state of Iowa 16 to expand the number of wells from which the Iowa geological 17 survey can monitor groundwater levels through a targeted pilot 18 program. 19 Sec. 2. PURPOSE. The purpose of this Act is to increase 20 the number of wells from which the Iowa geological survey can 21 monitor groundwater levels. Expanding monitoring capacity will 22 provide better statewide data on Iowaâs aquifers, strengthen 23 water management decisions, and protect public health. 24 Sec. 3. PILOT PROGRAM. 25 1. a. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 26 state to the department of natural resources for the fiscal 27 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 28 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 29 used for the purposes designated: 30 For purposes of establishing and administering a groundwater 31 monitoring expansion program created in this section, including 32 but not limited to procurement of certified monitoring 33 equipment; installation, calibration, and maintenance; 34 telemetry and data integration; program evaluation; and 35 -1- LSB 5169HV (1) 91 sb/js 1/ 5 H.F. 2687 reporting: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 2 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 3 this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 4 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 5 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 6 close of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2028, and ending 7 June 30, 2029. 8 2. The program shall provide retrofitting for up to one 9 hundred existing wells owned by businesses or other private 10 entities with monitoring equipment under the Iowa groundwater 11 monitoring pilot program. Participation shall be voluntary and 12 require written consent of the property owner. 13 3. The Iowa geological survey shall provide technical 14 guidance to the department of natural resources regarding site 15 selection, installation specifications, and data evaluation. 16 The Iowa geological survey shall prioritize wells that 17 represent a diversity of aquifers and geographic regions to 18 maximize the usefulness of the monitoring data. 19 4. Installations installed pursuant to this section shall 20 meet the following standards: 21 a. Use sanitary well caps and sealed cable entry systems to 22 prevent contamination. 23 b. Be performed by licensed well professionals in 24 compliance with Iowa well construction and public health 25 standards. 26 c. For all monitoring equipment installed in potable 27 wells, be certified for or equivalent to national sanitation 28 foundation/American national standards institute standards 61 29 and 372 to ensure safety for drinking water. 30 5. Monitoring equipment shall, at a minimum, measure 31 static water level and temperature, but submersible pressure 32 transducers or equivalent devices proven for groundwater 33 level monitoring shall be preferred. Telemetry may include 34 long-range wide area network, cellular, or satellite 35 -2- LSB 5169HV (1) 91 sb/js 2/ 5 H.F. 2687 systems as appropriate to site conditions, with emphasis on 1 cost-effectiveness. 2 6. All monitoring data shall be securely transmitted to the 3 Iowa geological survey for aggregation, storage, and analysis 4 and shall be integrated into the Iowa geological surveyâs 5 existing groundwater monitoring network. Well owners shall 6 have access to their own monitoring data for water management 7 and planning. 8 7. All costs of installation and equipment shall be covered 9 by the program within the amount appropriated pursuant to 10 subsection 1. 11 8. The department of natural resources, in consultation 12 with the Iowa geological survey, shall submit a report to the 13 general assembly by December 31, 2028, with the following 14 information: 15 a. The number and location of wells retrofitted. 16 b. Data quality and system reliability. 17 c. Cost per installation. 18 d. Recommendations for statewide expansion of groundwater 19 monitoring. 20 9. This section is repealed July 1, 2029. 21 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 22 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 23